Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-626
Streets and highways; use.

A city or village constructing a viaduct or subway as provided in sections 18-617 to 18-636 may appropriate any existing street or highway therefor and may acquire, extend, widen, or enlarge any street or highway for such purpose.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 8, p. 107;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 61.
August 28, 2021